Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1047.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 507(a) and (c) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 507. Restricted Account within Agricultural College Land Scrip Fund.--(a) A restricted account is [hereby] established within the Agricultural College Land Scrip Fund. The money in the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the State Treasurer for the purpose of funding agricultural research programs and agricultural extension services.* * *(c) [Following] Beginning no later than ten days after the effective date of an appropriation or transfer to the restricted account during a fiscal year, the State Treasurer shall pay, on an equal monthly basis during the fiscal year, the money in the restricted account to the Commonwealth's land grant university for agricultural research programs and for agricultural extension services.(c.1) Payment under subsection (c) may not be prohibited, withheld or delayed under any other law. The duty imposed on the State Treasurer under subsection (c) shall be exercised independently of whether or not there is an appropriation for general support to the Commonwealth's land grant university for the fiscal year in which payment under subsection (c) is required to occur.* * *20250HB1047PN1137 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1047PN1137 - 3 - 1